Connecticut, session 2026, HB05008.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That title 12 of the general statutes be amended to establish a tax
credit for small businesses, as defined by the United States Small
Business Administration, of two thousand eighty dollars per full-time
equivalent employee.